Massachusetts, session 194th, S676.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in Section 2(d), lines 46 and 47, the words “or if a 
carrier’s reported contribution to surplus exceeds 1.9 per cent” 
SECTION 2. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out Section 3(a)(i) and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:-market group size, including individual; small groups of 2-50; and large groups 
of greater than 50; and 
SECTION 3. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out Section 3(c) 
SECTION 4. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in Section 3(e), after the words “60 days” in line 96, the 
following words:- Life insurers will apply the RBC model according to 211 CMR 20.00. Those 

of 2 13 life and other multi-line carriers that have the majority of their liabilities in non-dental or non-
Massachusetts insurance lines shall not exceed 700% of their respective Company Action Level 
(CAL), as defined in 211 CMR 20.00. Massachusetts-based health and dental-only carriers shall 
apply the RBC model according to 211 CMR 25. 
SECTION 5. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out Section 3(f) and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- The commissioner may waive specific reporting requirements in this section 
for carriers unable to provide the required information; provided, however, that the 
commissioner shall provide written notice of any such waiver to the joint committee on health 
care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means.